Tables/Contraction/de-kurzschrift-1998.ctb
word bei 12
always bei 2-12
sufword beieinander 12-2-1246
sufword beifahr 12-2-1235
sufword beisetz 12-2-15
sufword beisitz 12-2-24
sufword beispiel 12-2-346
sufword beistand 12-2-23456
sufword beiständ 12-5-23456
sufword beistell 12-2-13456
sufword beizu 12-2-1356
always beizung 12-146-1356-136 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beiß 12-146-6-2346 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beine 12-1246-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinen 12-1246-14 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beines 12-1246-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beins 12-1246-234 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
before t always beinhal 23-35-125-25 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beinhalter 12-1246-125-25-2345-12456 should use the ei-contraction
always darmbein 145-356-134-12-1246
always gabeinvent 1245-1-23-35-1236-14-2345 Übergabeinventar shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always kreuzbein 13-1235-126-1356-12-1246
always schienbein 156-346-1345-12-1246
always schlüsselbein 156-123-1256-2346-13456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction

word dem 12356
always dem 2-12356
sufword demzu 12356-2-1356
endword dem 145-12356 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always außerdem 16-6-2346-12456-2-12356
always demask = demaskiert shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always demilit = shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always demonstr 145-12356-135-1345-23456-1235 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
word demo 145-12356-135 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
word demos 145-12356-135-234 shouldn't use the dem-contraction

word durch 1456
always durch 2-1456
sufword durcheinander 1456-2-1246
sufword durchfahr 1456-2-1235
sufword durchlass 1456-2-123
sufword durchläss 1456-5-123
sufword durchsprech 1456-2-2346
sufword durchsetz 1456-2-15
sufword durchspiel 1456-2-346
sufword durchstand 1456-2-23456
sufword durchstell 1456-2-13456
sufword durchzu 1456-2-1356
sufword durchzuck 2-1456-1356-136-46 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
word durchzug 2-1456-1356-136-1245 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
word durchzuges 2-1456-1356-136-1245-123456 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
sufword durchzugs 2-1456-1356-136-1245-234 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
begword durcheinandergerat 1456-2-1246-12346-1235-1-2345
always zugerat 2-1356-12346-1235-1-2345 shouldn't use the er-contraction
word für 124
always für 2-124
sufword füreinander 124-2-1246
always fürst 124-1256-1235-23456 shouldn't use the für-contraction
word gegen 1245
always gegen 2-1245
sufword gegenauf 1245-2-16
sufword gegeneinander 1245-2-1246
sufword gegenfahr 1245-2-1235
sufword gegensetz 1245-2-15
sufword gegenstand 1245-2-23456
sufword gegenständ 1245-5-23456
sufword gegenzu 1245-2-1356
prfword gegenzug 2-1245-1356-136-1245
prfword gegenzuge 2-1245-1356-136-12346
prfword gegenzuges 2-1245-1356-136-1245-123456
prfword gegenzugs 2-1245-1356-136-1245-234
before g sufword gegenzun 2-1245-1356-256
word gewesen 12346
always gewesen 2-12346
always fürsorgewesen 2-124-234-26-12346-2456-123456-14 shouldn't use the gewesen-contraction

word immer 1346
word immerzu 1346-2-1356
always immer 2-1346
always immersion 24-1346-12456-234-245 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
always immersiv 24-1346-12456-234-24-1236
always flimmer 124-123-24-1346-12456
always wimmer 2456-24-1346-12456 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
always zimmer 1356-24-1346-12456 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
word jetzt 245
always jetzt 2-245
word mehr 2356
always mehr 2-2356
sufword mehrstell 2356-2-13456
word mit 2345
always mit 2-2345
sufword mitauf 2345-2-16
sufword mitdürf 2345-2-145
sufword miteinander 2345-2-1246
sufword mitfahr 2345-2-1235
sufword mithab 2345-2-125
sufword mitkönn 2345-2-13
sufword mitmüss 2345-2-134
sufword mitnicht 2345-2-1345
sufword mitschrieb 2345-2-156
sufword mitspiel 2345-2-346
sufword mitunter 2345-2-256
sufword mitzu 2345-2-1356
word nicht 1345
word n 6-1345
always nicht 2-1345
sufword nichtauf 1345-2-16
sufword nichtzu 1345-2-1356
always nichtzughör 2-1345-1356-136-1245-125-246-1235
always nichtzuck 2-1345-1356-136-46
always nichtzusammen 2-1345-1356-234
word so 1234
always so 2-1234
sufword soundso 1234-2-136-2-1234
sufword sowie 1234-2-126
endword son =
begword sozu 1234-2-1356
always cursor = shouldn't use the so-contraction
begword		absol		=
begword		absorb		=
begword		absorp		=
always		adsorbier	1-145-234-26-12-346-1235
always		aerosol		1-12456-135-234-135-123
always		amtsober	1-134-2345-234-135-12-12456
always		anthroposo	235-2345-125-1235-135-1234-135-234-135
always		chromosom	1456-1235-135-134-135-234-135-134 shouldn't use the so-contraction
always		iso		=
always		konson		=
begmidword	sensor		234-14-234-26
endword		sensor		234-14-234-135-1235
endword		sensor		234-14-234-135-1235
always		sockel		234-135-46-13456
word		soda		=
always		soffizier	234-135-124-124-24-1356-346-1235
always		soft		=
always		soldat		=
endword		solo		=
always		sommer		234-135-1346-12456
before konsonant always	son =
always		sonogra		=
always		sonn		=
always		sonst		234-135-1345-23456
always		sorientier	234-26-24-14-2345-346-1235
before konsonant always	sor		234-26
always		source		=
sufword		south		=
always		sowjet		=
always		soziolo		=
midword ungsopt 136-234-135-1234-2345 Abendgestaltungsoption shouldn't use the so-contraction

word über 1256
word ueber 1256
always über 2-1256
sufword überdurch 1256-2-1456
sufword übereinander 1256-2-1246
sufword überzu 1256-2-1356
always überzucht 2-1256-1356-136-1456-2345
always überzuck 2-1256-1356-136-46
prfword überzug 2-1256-1356-136-1245
prfword überzuges 2-1256-1356-136-1245-123456
before konsonant always überzug 2-1256-1356-136-1245
always überlauf 2-1256-123-16-124
word und 136
always und 2-136
sufword gesund 12346-234-256-145
prfword hund 125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always hunde 125-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always hundert 125-256-145-12456-2345 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunderte 125-256-145-12456-236 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunden 125-256-145-14 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hundes 125-256-145-123456 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always kund 13-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always mund 134-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always rundfunk 1235-256-145-124-256-13 shouldn't use the und-contraction
sufword schrund 156-1235-256-145
always wund 2456-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction

word unter 256
always unter 2-256
sufword kunter 13-256-2345-12456 shouldn't use the unter-contraction
sufword kunterbunter 13-256-2345-12456-12-256-2345-12456
sufword munter 134-256-2345-12456 shouldn't use the unter-contraction
sufword untereinander 256-2-1246
always virus =
word voll 12345
always voll 2-12345
sufword vollständ 12345-5-23456
sufword vollzu 12345-2-1356
prfword vollzug 2-12345-1356-136-1245
prfword vollzuge 2-12345-1356-136-12346
prfword vollzuges 2-12345-1356-136-1245-123456
always vollzugs 2-12345-1356-136-1245-234
word von 1236
always von 2-1236
sufword voneinander 1236-2-1246
word vor 26
always vor 2-26
sufword vorbei 26-2-12
sufword vorspiel 26-2-346
sufword vorstell 26-2-13456
sufword vorüber 26-2-1256
sufword vorzu 26-2-1356
always vorzugs 2-26-1356-136-1245-234
always vorzugstimmen 2-26-1356-136-1245-23456-24-1346-14
always favorit 124-1-1236-26-24-2345 shouldn't use the vor-contraction
word wie 126
always wie 2-126
always zwiebel 1356-2456-346-12-13456 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
word zu 1356
always zu 2-1356
always zugentlast 1356-136-1245-14-2345-123-1-23456 shouldn't use the zu- nor ge-contraction
word indem 35-2-12356
word trotzdem 2345-1356-2-12356
word zudem 1356-2-12356
sufword zueinander 1356-2-1246
sufword zufahr 1356-2-1235
sufword zulass 1356-2-123
sufword zuläss 1356-5-123
sufword zuspiel 1356-2-346
sufword zustand 1356-2-23456
sufword zuständ 1356-5-23456
sufword zustell 1356-2-13456
sufword zuzu 1356-2-1356
always zucht 1356-136-1456-2345 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always zuck 1356-136-46 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
before g always zug =
endword zug =
endword zuges 1356-136-1245-123456

# Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend oder am Wortanfang
sufword ihr 24
sufword sein 246
word war 356
word waren 356-14
word warst 356-23456
word wart 356-2345
word war's 356-6-234
word wär 5-356
word wäre 5-356-15
word wären 5-356-14
word wärest 5-356-15-23456
word wäret 5-356-15-2345
word wärst 5-356-23456
word wärt 5-356-2345
word wär's 5-356-6-234

# Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend, mit Endungen oder in Wortverbindungen
always hatt 125
always hätt 345
always haett 345
always welch 13456

word adonis = shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always aktuell 1-13-2345-136-15-12345 should use the ll-contraction
always all 1-12345
sufword alle 1-15
always allegor 1-12345-15-1245-26 Allegorie shouldn't use the ae-contraction
always allein 1-1246
word allem 1-12356
always allen 1-14
always aller 1-12456
always allerg 1-12345-12456-1245 Allergiker
word alles 1-123456
always allesamt 1-12345-15-234-1-134-2345 shouldn't use the es-contraction
always alphabet 25-1234-125-1-12-15-2345 shouldn't use the hab-contraction
word also 1-135
always ander 2-12456
always wander 2456-235-145-12456 wandern shouldn't use the ander-contraction
sufword zander 1356-235-145-12456
always änder 5-12456
always abänder 1-12-5-12456
always bänder 12-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the änder-contraction
always aender 5-12456
always arbeit 356-12
before s always arbeits 356-12-234
always arben 356-12-14
always kauf 13-16-124
begword aussprech 16-2-2346
midendword aussprech 16-234-2-2346
midendword ausstell 16-234-2-13456
always australi 16-23456-1235-25-24 shouldn't use the aus-contraction
always austria 16-23456-1235-24-1 shouldn't use the aus-contraction
#begword äuß 5-34 FIXME: how to deal with äußerst?

always ähnlich 345-456
always aehnlich 345-456

word balsam 12-25-234-1-134
word been 12-15-15-1345 english word shouldn't use be- or en-contraction
always beere 12-15-15-1235-15
always beeren 12-15-15-1235-14
always behr 12-2356-1235 entbehren
begword beid 12-145 beiderseits
always berg 12-12456-1245 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always berge 12-12456-12346 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always bergen 12-12456-1245-14 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always berger 12-12456-1245-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always berges 12-12456-1245-123456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always besonder 23
always besser 234-234
contraction ss
word beim 12-134
contraction bm
word bis 12-234
sufword bisher 12-234-125-12456
sufword bislang 12-2345-123-1245
sufword bisweil 12-234-2456-146-123
always bison =

always bist 12-23456
always bistum 12-24-23456-136-134 shouldn't use the bist-contraction
always bleib 12-12
contraction bb
always blind 12-123
contraction bl
always brauch 2-34
always bräuch 5-34
always braeuch 5-34
always brief 12-124
contraction bf
always bring 12-1245
contraction bg

always charakter 1456-13
sufword chor 1456-135-1235 shouldn't use the or-contraction
always comput 6-14-135-134-1234-136-2345 computer should use the er-contraction
